Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB729.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 217(a)(3)(i) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 217. Time for Filing Returns.--(a) Quarterly and Monthly Returns:* * *(3) With respect to every licensee whose actual tax liability for the third calendar quarter of the preceding year equals or exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and is 12345678910111213141516171819202122 less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the licensee shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, file a single return consisting of all of the following:(i) [Either] For the period beginning after September 30, 2012, and ending before October 1, 2025 , either of the following:(A) An amount equal to fifty per centum of the licensee's actual tax liability for the same month in the preceding calendar year if the licensee was a monthly filer or, if the licensee was a quarterly or semi-annual filer, fifty per centum of the licensee's average actual tax liability for that tax period in the preceding calendar year. The average actual tax liability shall be the actual tax liability for the tax period divided by the number of months in that tax period. For licensees that were not in business during the same month in the preceding calendar year or were in business for only a portion of that month, fifty per centum of the average actual tax liability for each tax period the licensee has been in business. If the licensee is filing a tax liability for the first time with no preceding tax periods, the amount shall be zero.(B) An amount equal to or greater than fifty per centum of the licensee's actual tax liability for the same month.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0729PN0781 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324